California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The Division of Licensing may, in its discretion, designate other written examinations for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate that the division determines are equivalent to any other written examination for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate conducted by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 983, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2177.

(a) A passing score is required for an entire examination or for each part of an examination, as established by resolution of the board.

(b) Applicants may elect to take the written examinations conducted or accepted by the board in separate parts.

(c) (1) An applicant shall have obtained a passing score on all parts of Step 3 of the United States Medical Licensing Examination within not more than four attempts in order to be eligible for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an applicant who obtains a passing score on all parts of Step 3 of the United States Medical Licensing Examination in more than four attempts and who meets the requirements of Section 2135 or 2135.5 shall be eligible to be considered for issuance of a physician’s and surgeon’s
 certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2179.

The Division of Licensing shall insure that nutrition is included on the examination for a certificate as a physician and surgeon.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 889, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2183.

An applicant for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate shall pass the national examination for medical licensure in biomedical sciences and clinical sciences, including geriatric medicine, determined by the Division of Licensing to be essential for the unsupervised practice of medicine.

An applicant who applies for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate on or after January 1, 2004, shall have completed coursework in geriatric medicine in medical school or in postgraduate medical education training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 440, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2184.

(a) Each applicant shall obtain on the written examination a passing score, established by the board pursuant to Section 2177.

(b) (1) Passing scores on each step of the United States Medical Licensing Examination shall be valid for a period of 10 years from the month of the examination for purposes of qualification for licensure in California.

(2) The period of validity provided for in paragraph (1) may be extended by the board for any of the following:

(A) For good cause.

(B) For time spent in a postgraduate training program, including, but not limited to, residency training, clinical training, fellowship training, remedial or refresher training, or other training that is intended to maintain or improve medical skills.

(C) For an applicant who is a physician and surgeon in another state or a Canadian province who is currently and actively practicing medicine in that state or province.

(3) Upon expiration of the 10-year period plus any extension granted by the board under paragraph (2), the applicant shall pass the Special Purpose Examination of the Federation of State Medical Boards or a clinical competency written examination determined by the board to be equivalent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 11.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2186.

An applicant who is a diplomate of the National Board of Medical Examiners shall not be required to take the written examination prescribed by this article, provided such applicant meets the requirements of Section 2151.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Continuing Medical Education [2190. - 2196.9.]

2190.

In order to ensure the continuing competence of licensed physicians and surgeons, the board shall adopt and administer standards for the continuing education of those licensees. The board may also set content standards for any educational activity concerning a chronic disease that includes appropriate information on prevention of the chronic disease, and on treatment of patients with the chronic disease, by the application of changes in nutrition and lifestyle behavior. The board shall require each licensed physician and surgeon to demonstrate satisfaction of the continuing education requirements at intervals of not less than four nor more than six years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 236, Sec. 2.   (SB 380)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.1.

(a) The continuing medical education standards of Section 2190 may be met by educational activities that meet the standards of the board and that serve to maintain, develop, or increase the knowledge, skills, and professional performance that a physician and surgeon uses to provide care, or to improve the quality of care provided to patients. These may include, but are not limited to, educational activities that meet any of the following criteria:

(1) Have a scientific or clinical content with a direct bearing on the quality or cost-effective provision of patient care, community or public health, or preventive medicine.

(2) Concern quality assurance or improvement, risk management, health facility
 standards, or the legal aspects of clinical medicine.

(3) Concern bioethics or professional ethics.

(4) Are designed to improve the physician-patient relationship and quality of physician-patient communication.

(b) (1) On and after July 1, 2006, all continuing medical education courses shall contain curriculum that includes cultural and linguistic competency in the practice of medicine.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), a continuing medical education course dedicated solely to research or other issues that does not include a direct patient care component or a course offered by a continuing medical education provider that is not located in this state is not required to contain curriculum that includes cultural and
 linguistic competency in the practice of medicine.

(3) Associations that accredit continuing medical education courses shall develop standards before July 1, 2006, for compliance with the requirements of paragraph (1). The associations may update these standards, as needed, in accordance with the following requirements:

(A) The standards shall be updated in conjunction with an advisory group that has expertise in cultural and linguistic competency
 issues and is informed of federal and state statutory threshold language requirements, with prioritization of languages in proportion to the state population’s most prevalent primary languages spoken by 10 percent or more of the state population.

(B) The standards shall be updated to ensure program standards meet the needs of California’s changing demographics and properly address language disparities, as they emerge.

(4) A physician and surgeon who completes a continuing education course meeting the standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3) satisfies the continuing education requirement for cultural and linguistic competency.

(c) In order to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (b), continuing medical education courses shall address at least one or a combination of the following:

(1) Cultural competency. For the purposes of this section, “cultural competency” means a set of integrated attitudes, knowledge, and skills that enables a health care professional or organization to care effectively for patients from diverse cultures, groups, and communities. At a minimum, cultural competency is recommended to include the following:

(A) Applying linguistic skills to communicate effectively with the target population.

(B) Utilizing cultural information to establish therapeutic relationships.

(C) Eliciting and
 incorporating pertinent cultural data in diagnosis and treatment.

(D) (i) Understanding and applying culturally, ethnically, and sociologically inclusive data to the process of clinical care, including, as appropriate, information and evidence-based cultural competency training pertinent to the treatment of, and provision of care to, individuals who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning, asexual, intersex, or gender diverse. This includes processes specific to those seeking gender-affirming care services.

(ii) An evidence-based cultural competency training implemented pursuant to clause (i) may include all of the following:

(I) Information about the effects, including, but not limited to, ongoing personal effects of historical and contemporary exclusion and
 oppression of transgender, gender diverse, or intersex (TGI) communities.

(II) Information about communicating more effectively across gender identities, including TGI-inclusive terminology, using people’s correct names and pronouns, even when they are not reflected in records or legal documents, avoiding language, whether verbal or nonverbal, that demeans, ridicules, or condemns TGI individuals, and avoiding making assumptions about gender identity by using gender-neutral language and avoiding language that presumes all individuals are heterosexual, cisgender, or gender conforming, or nonintersex.

(III) Discussion on health inequities within the TGI community, including family and community acceptance.

(IV) Perspectives of diverse, local constituency groups and TGI-serving
 organizations, including, but not limited to, the California Transgender Advisory Council.

(V) Recognition of the difference between personal values and professional responsibilities with regard to serving TGI people.

(VI) Recommendations on administrative changes to make health care facilities more inclusive.

(2) Linguistic competency. For the purposes of this section, “linguistic competency” means the ability of a physician and surgeon to provide patients who do not speak English or who have limited ability to speak English, direct communication in the patient’s primary language.

(3) A review and explanation of relevant federal and state laws and regulations regarding linguistic access, including, but not limited
 to, the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq.), Executive Order 13166 of August 11, 2000, of the President of the United States, and the Dymally-Alatorre Bilingual Services Act (Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) (1) On and after January 1, 2022, all continuing medical education courses shall contain curriculum that includes the understanding of implicit bias.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), a continuing medical education course dedicated solely to research or other issues that does not include a direct patient care component or a course offered by a continuing medical education provider that is not located in this state is not required to contain curriculum that includes implicit bias in the practice of medicine.

(3) Associations that accredit continuing medical education courses shall develop standards before January 1, 2022, for compliance with the requirements of paragraph (1). The associations may update these standards, as needed, in conjunction with an advisory group established by the association that has expertise in the understanding of implicit bias.

(e) In order to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (d), continuing medical education courses shall address at least one or a combination of the following:

(1) Examples of how implicit bias affects perceptions and treatment decisions of physicians and surgeons, leading to disparities in health outcomes.

(2) Strategies to address how unintended biases in decisionmaking may contribute to health care
 disparities by shaping behavior and producing differences in medical treatment along lines of race, ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, socioeconomic status, or other characteristics.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), educational activities that are not directed toward the practice of medicine, or are directed primarily toward the business aspects of medical practice, including, but not limited to, medical office management, billing and coding, and marketing shall not be deemed to meet the continuing medical education standards for licensed physicians and surgeons.

(g) Educational activities that meet the content standards set forth in this section and are accredited by the California Medical Association or the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education may be deemed by the Division of Licensing to meet its continuing medical education
 standards.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “TGI” means transgender, gender diverse, or intersex.

(2) “TGI-serving organization” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 150900 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   (AB 470)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.15.

Notwithstanding Section 2190.1, a physician and surgeon may meet the continuing medical education standards in Section 2190 through continuing medical education courses that meet any of the criteria below, except that these courses shall not together comprise more than 30 percent of the total hours of continuing medical education completed by a licensee to satisfy the continuing educational requirement established by the board:

(a) Have practice management content designed to provide better service to patients, including, but not limited to, the use of technology or clinical office workflow.

(b) Have management content
 designed to support managing a health care facility, including, but not limited to, coding or reimbursement in a medical practice.

(c) Support educational methodology for physicians and surgeons teaching in a medical school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   (AB 359)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.2.

The Division of Licensing shall establish criteria that providers of continuing medical education shall follow to ensure attendance by licensees throughout the entire course.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 440, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.3.

All general internists and family physicians who have a patient population of which over 25 percent are 65 years of age or older shall complete at least 20 percent of all mandatory continuing education hours in a course in the field of geriatric medicine, the special care needs of patients with dementia, or the care of older patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.4.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2027, a qualifying physician and surgeon who completes continuing medical education courses in perimenopause, menopause, and postmenopausal care shall receive two hours of credit for each hour completed of that coursework, for a total earned credit that does not exceed eight course hours, toward the requirement set forth in Section 1336 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualifying physician and surgeon” means a holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate from the board who is certified by a member board of the American Board of Medical Specialties in internal medicine, family medicine, obstetrics and gynecology, neurology, neurological surgery, or psychiatry and
 whose patient population includes adult women under 65 years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 1.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.5.

(a) (1) All physicians and surgeons shall complete a mandatory continuing education course in the subjects of pain management and the treatment of terminally ill and dying patients. For the purposes of this section, this course shall be a one-time requirement of 12 credit hours within the required minimum established by regulation, to be completed by December 31, 2006. All physicians and surgeons licensed on and after January 1, 2002, shall complete this requirement within four years of their initial license or by their second renewal date, whichever occurs first. The board may verify completion of this requirement on the renewal application form.

(2) For physicians and surgeons licensed on or after
 January 1, 2019, the course described in paragraph (1) shall also include the subject of the risks of addiction associated with the use of Schedule II drugs.

(b) By regulatory action, the board may exempt physicians and surgeons by practice status category from the requirement in subdivision (a) if the physician and surgeon does not engage in direct patient care, does not provide patient consultations, or does not reside in the State of California.

(c) This section shall not apply to physicians and surgeons practicing in pathology or radiology specialty areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 693, Sec. 3.   (SB 1109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.6.

(a) As an alternative to Section 2190.5, a physician and surgeon may complete a one-time continuing education course of 12 credit hours in the subject of treatment and management of opiate-dependent patients, including eight hours of training in buprenorphine treatment, or other similar medicinal treatment, for opioid use disorders.

(b) A physician and surgeon who meets the requirements, as determined by the board, of a “qualifying physician” under clause (ii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subsection (g) of Section 823 of Title 21 of the United States Code, the Comprehensive Addiction Recovery Act of 2016 (Public Law 114-198), as that clause read on January 1, 2018, shall be deemed to have met the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) A physician and surgeon who chooses to comply with this section as an alternative to Section 2190.5 shall complete the requirements of this section by the physician and surgeon’s next license renewal date.

(d) The board shall determine whether a physician and surgeon has met the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 4.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.

(a) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in human sexuality, defined as the study of a human being as a sexual being and how they function with respect thereto, and nutrition to be taken by those licensees whose practices may require knowledge in those areas.

(b) The board shall consider including a course in child abuse detection and treatment to be taken by those licensees whose practices are of a nature that there is a likelihood of contact with abused or neglected children.

(c) The board shall consider including a course in acupuncture to be taken by those licensees whose practices may require knowledge in the area of acupuncture and whose
 education has not included instruction in acupuncture.

(d) The board shall encourage every physician and surgeon to take nutrition as part of their continuing education, particularly a physician and surgeon involved in primary care.

(e) The board shall consider including a course in elder abuse detection and treatment to be taken by those licensees whose practices are of a nature that there is a likelihood of contact with abused or neglected persons 65 years of age and older.

(f) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in the early detection and treatment of substance abusing pregnant women to be taken by those licensees whose practices are of a nature that there is a likelihood of contact with these women.

(g) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in the special care needs of drug-addicted infants to be taken by those licensees whose practices are of a nature that there is a likelihood of contact with these infants.

(h) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course providing training and guidelines on how to routinely screen for signs exhibited by abused women, particularly for physicians and surgeons in emergency, surgical, primary care, pediatric, prenatal, and mental health settings. In the event the board establishes a requirement for continuing education coursework in spousal or partner abuse detection or treatment, that requirement shall be met by each licensee within no more than four years from the date the requirement is imposed.

(i) In determining
 its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in the special care needs of individuals and their families facing end-of-life issues, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Pain and symptom management.

(2) The psychosocial dynamics of death.

(3) Dying and bereavement.

(4) Hospice care.

(j) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall give its highest priority to considering a course on pain management and the risks of addiction associated with the use of Schedule II drugs.

(k) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall
 consider including a course in geriatric care for emergency room physicians and surgeons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 2.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.1.

The Division of Licensing shall encourage every physician and surgeon to take a course in pharmacology and pharmaceuticals as part of his or her continuing education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1600, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.2.

The division shall encourage every physician and surgeon to take a course in geriatric medicine, including geriatric pharmacology, as part of his or her continuing education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 440, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.4.

The board, in determining its continuing education requirements, shall consider including a course in integrating HIV/AIDS pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP) and post-exposure prophylaxis (PEP) medication maintenance and counseling in primary care settings, especially as it pertains to HIV testing, access to care, counseling, high-risk communities, patient concerns, exposure to HIV/AIDS, and the appropriate care and treatment referrals. That course shall be consistent with the most recent guidelines on PrEP and PEP as published by the United States Public Health Service and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   (AB 1791)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.5.

In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in integrating mental and physical health care in primary care settings, especially as it pertains to early identification of mental health issues and exposure to trauma in children and young adults and their appropriate care and treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.6.

In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in infection-associated chronic conditions, including, but not limited to, long COVID, as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, myalgic encephalomyelitis, and dysautonomia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (AB 3119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.

The board shall periodically develop and disseminate information and educational material regarding the detection and treatment of child abuse and neglect to each licensed physician and surgeon and to each general acute care hospital in the state. The board shall consult with the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in developing the materials distributed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.1.

The board shall periodically develop and disseminate information and educational material regarding the detection and treatment of elder abuse and neglect to each licensed physician and surgeon and to each general acute care hospital in this state. The board shall consult with the Adult Protective Services Division of the State Department of Social Services in developing the materials distributed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.2.

The board shall periodically develop and disseminate information and educational material regarding pain management techniques and procedures, including the risks of addiction associated with the use of Schedule II drugs, to each licensed physician and surgeon and to each general acute care hospital in this state. The board shall consult with the State Department of Public Health in developing the materials to be distributed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 693, Sec. 5.   (SB 1109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.5.

The board shall periodically disseminate information and educational material regarding the detection and treatment of spousal or partner abuse to each licensed physician and surgeon and to each general acute care hospital in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1234, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.6.

The board shall periodically disseminate information and educational material regarding the prevention and treatment of chronic disease by the application of changes in nutrition and lifestyle behavior to each licensed physician and surgeon and to each general acute care hospital in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.   (SB 380)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.7.

The board shall convene a working group of interested parties to discuss nutrition and lifestyle behavior for the prevention and treatment of chronic disease at one of its quarterly meetings within three years after the operative date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 236, Sec. 4.   (SB 380)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.8.

The board shall periodically develop and disseminate information and educational material regarding assessing a patient’s risk of abusing or diverting controlled substances and information relating to the Controlled Substance Utilization Review and Evaluation System (CURES), described in Section 11165 of the Health and Safety Code, to each licensed physician and surgeon and to each general acute care hospital in this state. The board shall consult with the State Department of Public Health, the boards and committees specified in subdivision (d) of Section 208, and the Department of Justice in developing the materials to be distributed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 400, Sec. 4.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.9.

(a) In determining its continuing education requirements for physicians and surgeons, the board shall consider including a course in maternal mental health, which shall address the following:

(1) Best practices in screening for maternal mental health disorders, including cultural competency and unintended bias as a means to build trust with mothers.

(2) The range of maternal mental health disorders.

(3) The range of evidence-based treatment options, including the importance of allowing a mother to be involved in developing the treatment plan.

(4) When an obstetrician or a primary care doctor should consult with a psychiatrist versus making a referral.

(5) Applicable requirements under Sections 123640 and 123616.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Subject to Section 2001.1, the board shall periodically update any curriculum developed pursuant to this section to account for new
 research.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (AB 845)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Cultural and Linguistic Competency of Physicians Act of 2003 [2198. - 2198.1.]

2198.

(a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the Cultural and Linguistic Competency of Physicians Act of 2003. The cultural and linguistic physician competency program is hereby established and shall be operated by local medical societies of the California Medical Association and shall be monitored by the Division of Licensing.

(b) This program shall be a voluntary program for all interested physicians. As a primary objective, the program shall consist of educational classes which shall be designed to teach physicians the following:

(1) A foreign language at the level of proficiency that initially improves their ability to communicate with non-English speaking patients.

(2) A foreign language at the level of proficiency that eventually enables direct communication with the non-English speaking patients.

(3) Cultural beliefs and practices that may impact patient health care practices and allow physicians to incorporate this knowledge in the diagnosis and treatment of patients who are not from the predominate culture in California.

(c) The program shall operate through local medical societies and shall be developed to address the ethnic language minority groups of interest to local medical societies.

(d) In dealing with Spanish language and cultural practices of Mexican immigrant communities, the cultural and linguistic training program shall be developed with direct input from physician groups in Mexico who serve the same immigrant population in Mexico. A similar approach may be used for any of the languages and cultures that are taught by the program or appropriate ethnic medical societies may be consulted for the development of these programs.

(e) Training programs shall be based and developed on the established knowledge of providers already serving target populations and shall be formulated in collaboration with the California Medical Association, the Division of Licensing, and other California-based ethnic medical societies.

(f) Programs shall include standards that identify the degree of competency for participants who successfully complete independent parts of the course of instruction.

(g) Programs shall seek accreditation by the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education.

(h) The Division of Licensing shall convene a workgroup including, but not limited to, representatives of affected patient populations, medical societies engaged in program delivery, and community clinics to perform the following functions:

(1) Evaluation of the progress made in the achievement of the intent of this article.

(2) Determination of the means by which achievement of the intent of this article can be enhanced.

(3) Evaluation of the reasonableness and the consistency of the standards developed by those entities delivering the program.

(4) Determination and recommendation of the credit to be given to participants who successfully complete the identified programs. Factors to be considered in this determination shall include, at a minimum, compliance with requirements for continuing medical education and eligibility for increased rates of reimbursement under Medi-Cal, the Healthy Families Program, and health maintenance organization contracts.

(i) Funding shall be provided by fees charged to physicians who elect to take these educational classes and any other funds that local medical societies may secure for this purpose.

(j) A survey for language minority patients shall be developed and distributed by local medical societies, to measure the degree of satisfaction with physicians who have taken the educational classes on cultural and linguistic competency provided under this section. Local medical societies shall also develop an evaluation survey for physicians to assess the quality of educational or training programs on cultural and linguistic competency. This information shall be shared with the workgroup established by the Division of Licensing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 510, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2198.1.

For purposes of this article, “cultural and linguistic competency” means cultural and linguistic abilities that can be incorporated into therapeutic and medical evaluation and treatment, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Direct communication in the patient-client primary language.

(b) Understanding and applying the roles that culture, ethnicity, and race play in diagnosis, treatment, and clinical care.

(c) Awareness of how the health care providers and patients attitudes, values, and beliefs influence and impact professional and patient relations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 510, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Surgery in Certain Outpatient Settings [2215. - 2217.]

2215.

The Legislature finds and declares that in this state, significant surgeries are being performed in unregulated out-of-hospital settings. The Legislature further finds and declares that without appropriate oversight, some of these settings may be operating in a manner which is injurious to the public health, welfare, and safety. Although the health professionals delivering health care services in these settings are licensed, further quality assurance is needed to ensure that health care services are safely and effectively performed in these settings. The Legislature further recognizes that there is a wide range of surgical procedures safely performed in a myriad of outpatient settings, and the degree of patient risk varies greatly. It is the intent of the Legislature to create regulations that directly impact patient safety. It is not the intent of the Legislature to require standards in excess of those requirements in Section 1248.15, or to require physical modifications to facilities unless the modifications or standards directly impact patient safety and are cost-effective. The cost effectiveness of any modifications shall be taken into consideration by the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California, and shall ensure that the least costly and effective method of achieving patient safety is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1276, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2216.

On or after July 1, 1996, no physician and surgeon shall perform procedures in an outpatient setting using anesthesia, except local anesthesia or peripheral nerve blocks, or both, complying with the community standard of practice, in doses that, when administered, have the probability of placing a patient at risk for loss of the patient’s life-preserving protective reflexes, unless the setting is specified in Section 1248.1. Outpatient settings where anxiolytics and analgesics are administered are excluded when administered, in compliance with the community standard of practice, in doses that do not have the probability of placing the patient at risk for loss of the patient’s life-preserving protective reflexes.

The definition of “outpatient settings” contained in subdivision (c) of Section 1248 shall apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1276, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2216.1.

On and after July 1, 2000, it is unprofessional conduct for a physician and surgeon to perform procedures in any outpatient setting except in compliance with Section 2216, unless the setting has a minimum of two staff persons on the premises, one of whom shall either be a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed health care professional with current certification in advanced cardiac life support (ACLS), as long as a patient is present who has not been discharged from supervised care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2216.2.

(a) It is unprofessional conduct for a physician and surgeon to fail to provide adequate security by liability insurance, or by participation in an interindemnity trust, for claims by patients arising out of surgical procedures performed outside of a general acute care hospital as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, the board shall determine what constitutes adequate security.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require an insurer admitted to transact liability insurance in this state to provide coverage to a physician and surgeon.

(d) The security required by this section shall be acceptable only if provided by any one of the following:

(1) An insurer admitted pursuant to Section 700 of the Insurance Code to transact liability insurance in this state.

(2) An insurer that is eligible pursuant to Section 1765.1 of the Insurance Code.

(3) A cooperative corporation authorized by Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code.

(4) An insurer licensed to transact liability insurance in at least one state of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

2216.3.

(a) An outpatient setting accredited pursuant to Section 1248.1 of the Health and Safety Code shall report an adverse event to the board no later than five days after the adverse event has been detected, or, if that event is an ongoing urgent or emergent threat to the welfare, health, or safety of patients, personnel, or visitors, not later than 24 hours after the adverse event has been detected. Disclosure of individually identifiable patient information shall be consistent with applicable law.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “adverse event” includes any of the following:

(1) Surgical or other invasive procedures,
 including the following:

(A) Surgical or other invasive procedure performed on a wrong body part that is inconsistent with the documented informed consent for that patient. A reportable event under this subparagraph does not include a situation requiring prompt action that occurs in the course of surgery or a situation that is so urgent as to preclude obtaining informed consent.

(B) Surgical or other invasive procedure performed on the wrong patient.

(C) The wrong surgical or other invasive procedure performed on a patient, which is a procedure performed on a patient that is inconsistent with the documented informed consent for that patient. A reportable event under this subparagraph does not include a situation
 requiring prompt action that occurs in the course of surgery, or a situation that is so urgent as to preclude the obtaining of informed consent.

(D) Retention of a foreign object in a patient after surgery or other procedure, excluding objects intentionally implanted as part of a planned intervention and objects present prior to surgery that are intentionally retained.
